Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 10 TLSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 834 DIVISION I 1 ELECTRIC POWER GENERATION, ENERGY STORAGE, AND TRANSMISSION 2 FACILITY RATEMAKING PRINCIPLES 3 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 476.52A Definitions. 4 As used in this subchapter unless the context otherwise 5 requires: 6 1. âAlternate energy production facilityâ means the same as 7 defined in section 476.42. 8 2. âEnergy storageâ means any system, equipment, facility, 9 or technology that is capable of absorbing energy, storing the 10 energy for a period of time, and dispatching the energy through 11 one of the following manners: 12 a. Using mechanical, electrochemical, thermal, 13 electrolysis, or other processes to convert and store electric 14 energy that was generated at an earlier time for use at a later 15 time. 16 b. Using mechanical, electrochemical, biochemical, or 17 thermal processes to convert and store energy generated 18 from mechanical processes that would otherwise be wasted for 19 delivery at a later time. 20 c. Storing energy in an electric, thermal, or gaseous 21 state for direct use for heating or cooling at a later time 22 in a manner that avoids the need to use electricity or other 23 fuel sources at that later time, such as a grid-enabled water 24 heater. 25 3. âNuclear reactorâ means an apparatus designed to produce 26 electrical or heat energy through sustained nuclear fission in 27 a self-supporting chain reaction. 28 4. âRepoweringâ means either the complete dismantling and 29 replacement of generation equipment at an existing project 30 site, or the installation of new parts and equipment to an 31 existing alternate energy production facility in order to 32 increase energy production, reduce load, increase service 33 capacity, improve project reliability, or extend the useful 34 life of the facility. 35 -1- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 53 H.F. 834 Sec. 2. Section 476.53, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. It is the intent of the general assembly to attract 3 the development of electric power generating , energy storage, 4 and transmission facilities within the state in sufficient 5 quantity to ensure reliable electric service to Iowa consumers , 6 ensure an adequate base load, and provide economic benefits to 7 the state. Ensuring reliable electric service and providing 8 economic benefits may require public utilities to consider 9 diverse electric power generating technologies and energy 10 storage technologies, including alternate energy production 11 facilities, nuclear reactors, and energy storage facilities. 12 It is also the intent of the general assembly to encourage 13 rate-regulated public utilities to consider altering existing 14 electric power generating facilities, where when reasonable, 15 to manage carbon emission intensity in order to facilitate the 16 transition to a carbon-constrained environment. It is also the 17 intent of the general assembly to encourage the development 18 of nuclear electric power generation within the state using 19 nuclear reactors and to use nuclear power to meet local and 20 regional electric needs. 21 Sec. 3. Section 476.53, subsection 3, paragraphs a, b, c, 22 and d, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 23 a. The commission shall specify in advance, by order issued 24 after conduct a contested case proceeding , the ratemaking 25 principles that will apply when the costs of the electric power 26 generating facility or alternate energy production facility are 27 included in regulated electric rates whenever a rate-regulated 28 public utility does seeks ratemaking principles for any of the 29 following: 30 (1) (a) Files an application pursuant to section 476A.3 31 to construct The costs of constructing in Iowa a baseload an 32 electric power generating facility with a nameplate generating 33 capacity equal to or greater than three hundred forty megawatts 34 or a combined-cycle electric power generating facility , or an 35 -2- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 2/ 53 H.F. 834 alternate energy production facility as defined in section 1 476.42 , or an energy storage facility, or the construction 2 costs to significantly alter an existing electric power 3 generating facility , alternate energy production facility, or 4 energy storage facility . For purposes of this subparagraph, 5 a significant alteration of an existing generating facility , 6 alternate energy production facility, or energy storage 7 facility must, in order to qualify for establishment of 8 ratemaking principles, fall into one of the following 9 categories: 10 (i) Conversion of a coal fueled an electric power generating 11 facility into a gas fueled to an alternate fuel type for the 12 electric power generating facility. 13 (ii) Addition of carbon capture and storage facilities at a 14 coal fueled to an existing electric power generating facility. 15 (iii) Addition of gas fueled capability to a coal fueled 16 facility, in order to convert the facility to one that will 17 rely primarily on gas for future generation facilities to 18 capture exhaust heat and thereby generate additional electric 19 power at an existing electric power generating facility . 20 (iv) Addition of a biomass fueled capability to a coal 21 fueled facility. 22 (v) (iv) Repowering of an alternate energy production 23 facility. For purposes of this subparagraph subdivision, 24 ârepoweringâ shall mean either the complete dismantling and 25 replacement of generation equipment at an existing project 26 site, or the installation of new parts and equipment to an 27 existing alternate energy production facility in order to 28 increase energy production, reduce load, increase service 29 capacity, improve project reliability, or extend the useful 30 life of the facility. 31 (v) Addition of energy storage at an existing electric power 32 generating facility, alternate energy production facility, or 33 energy storage facility. 34 (b) With respect to a significant alteration of an 35 -3- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 3/ 53 H.F. 834 existing generating facility, an original facility shall 1 not be required to be either a baseload or a combined-cycle 2 facility. Only only the incremental investment undertaken 3 by a utility under subparagraph division (a), subparagraph 4 subdivision (i), (ii), or (iii), or (iv) shall be eligible 5 to apply the ratemaking principles established by the order 6 issued pursuant to paragraph âeâ . Facilities for which advanced 7 advance ratemaking principles are obtained pursuant to this 8 section shall not be subject to a subsequent commission review 9 pursuant to section 476.6, subsection 19 , to the extent that 10 the investment has been considered by the commission under 11 this section . To the extent an eligible utility has been 12 authorized to make capital investments subject to section 13 476.6, subsection 19 , such investments shall not be eligible 14 for ratemaking principles pursuant to this section . 15 (2) Leases or owns When leased or owned in Iowa, in whole or 16 in part, a new baseload electric power generating facility with 17 a nameplate generating capacity equal to or greater than three 18 hundred forty megawatts or a combined-cycle electric power 19 generating , a new energy storage facility, or a new alternate 20 energy production facility as defined in section 476.42 . 21 b. If the commission finds that the utilityâs application 22 meets the requirements of paragraph âcâ , the commission shall 23 specify by order issued after the contested case proceeding 24 the ratemaking principles that will apply when the costs of 25 the electric power generating facility or alternate energy 26 production facility are included in regulated electric rates. 27 In determining the applicable ratemaking principles, the 28 commission shall not be limited to traditional ratemaking 29 principles or traditional cost recovery mechanisms. Among the 30 principles and mechanisms the commission may consider, the 31 commission has the authority to approve ratemaking principles 32 proposed by a rate-regulated public utility that provide for 33 reasonable restrictions upon the ability of the public utility 34 to seek a general increase in electric rates under section 35 -4- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 4/ 53 H.F. 834 476.6 for at least three years after the generating facility 1 begins providing service to Iowa customers. 2 c. In determining the applicable ratemaking principles, the 3 commission shall make the following findings: 4 (1) The rate-regulated public utility has in effect a 5 commission-approved energy efficiency plan as required under 6 section 476.6, subsection 15 . 7 (2) The rate-regulated public utility has demonstrated to 8 the commission that the public utility has considered other 9 sources for long-term electric supply and that the facility or 10 lease is reasonable when compared to other feasible alternative 11 sources of supply. The rate-regulated public utility shall 12 provide support of reasonability with an electric utility 13 resource plan pursuant to section 476.53C that has been updated 14 no more than twenty-four months prior to the filing of the 15 public utilityâs application. 16 d. The applicable ratemaking principles shall be determined 17 in a contested case proceeding , which proceeding required by 18 paragraph âaâ may be combined with the proceeding for issuance 19 of a certificate conducted pursuant to chapter 476A . 20 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 476.53B Commission authority and 21 proceedings. 22 The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 23 to provide for the completion of proceedings under section 24 476.53 within ten months after the date of the filing of an 25 application under section 476.53, subsection 3. The rules 26 shall include reasonable time limitations for the submission or 27 completion of comments and testimony, and exhibits, briefs, and 28 hearings, and may provide for the granting of additional time 29 upon the request of a party to the proceeding for good cause 30 shown. 31 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 476.53C Electric utility resource 32 planning. 33 1. An electric utility required to be rate-regulated by the 34 commission shall file a resource plan at least once every five 35 -5- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 5/ 53 H.F. 834 years. A resource plan shall consider all reasonable resources 1 proposed by the utility for meeting the probable future demand 2 for energy, including supply resources and conservation and 3 management of demand. For conservation and management of 4 demand, an electric utilityâs resource plan shall include 5 programs approved in the electric utilityâs most recent energy 6 efficiency plan approved by the commission under section 476.6, 7 subsection 15. The objectives of a resource plan include but 8 are not limited to adequate, cost-effective, and reliable 9 energy service considering costs, fuel diversity, and probable 10 future demand for energy. A resource plan shall not require a 11 specific outcome or specific investment decisions. A resource 12 plan shall reflect the circumstances and management judgment 13 of an electric utility. This section does not restrict an 14 electric utility from making planning decisions based on future 15 resource needs subject to the ratemaking oversight of the 16 commission. 17 2. The commission shall review a resource plan. Within 18 ninety days of filing the final resource plan, the commission 19 shall issue an order acknowledging it has received the plan. 20 In the order acknowledging receipt, the commission may provide 21 recommendations to an electric utility regarding any additional 22 analyses or actions that the electric utility should consider 23 completing in its next resource plan. 24 3. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 25 17A regarding the timeline and stakeholder process to review 26 and provide comments on the resource plan. The stakeholder 27 process shall include the electric utility organizing and 28 facilitating a stakeholder conference for the resource plan. 29 The stakeholder conference shall include representatives of the 30 commission, the consumer advocate, and the electric utilityâs 31 customers. The electric utility shall make a good faith effort 32 to inform and consider input from the commission, the consumer 33 advocate, and stakeholders. 34 DIVISION II 35 -6- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 6/ 53 H.F. 834 TARIFFS FOR PUBLIC UTILITY INNOVATION PROGRAMS 1 Sec. 6. Section 476.6, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 22. Innovative utility programs. 4 a. It is the intent of the general assembly to encourage 5 public utilities to pursue innovation in pricing and programs 6 to meet the dynamic needs of current and prospective customers, 7 enable price-responsive solutions, and to provide economic, 8 environmental, employment, and other benefits to the state. 9 It is also the intent of the general assembly that these 10 new endeavors shall not negatively impact nonparticipating 11 customers. Therefore, the general assembly declares that 12 innovative utility programs are essential to further the 13 attraction and retention of customers to benefit the stateâs 14 economy and to support economical and sustainable energy 15 production. 16 b. (1) A tariff authorized under this subsection shall 17 comply with all of the following conditions: 18 (a) A program created under the tariff shall be available to 19 interested energy customers and customer participation shall 20 be optional. 21 (b) A tariff shall define the eligible customer groups. 22 (c) An eligible customer group shall not exclude directly 23 competing customers in the same customer service territory. 24 For purposes of this subparagraph, âdirectly competing 25 customersâ means customers that make the same end product or 26 offer the same service for the same general group of customers, 27 and excludes customers that only produce component parts of the 28 same end product. 29 (d) Participating customers shall bear all program costs. 30 Program costs include direct costs associated with the 31 construction, operation, maintenance, and interconnection of 32 facilities, including new transmission infrastructure directly 33 arising from the tariff program and costs related to the 34 implementation of tariff programs. Participants in a tariff 35 -7- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 7/ 53 H.F. 834 approved pursuant to this section shall participate in future 1 indirect costs allocated to customers of that utility without 2 regard for the existence of a tariff approved pursuant to this 3 section. 4 (e) A tariff shall not alter the existing base rates or 5 charges of the public utility. Refund, credit, or waiver of 6 existing base rates or charges offered as part of the program 7 shall not be considered an alteration of existing base rates 8 or charges. 9 (f) The program created under the tariff shall not 10 negatively impact nonparticipating customers. Additional 11 costs incurred by nonparticipating customers due to costs 12 arising from the tariff, tariff participants no longer sharing 13 in customer class costs, or decreased customer benefit from 14 existing infrastructure shall be considered negative impacts. 15 (2) A tariff authorized under this subsection may include 16 any of the following: 17 (a) Recovery of costs associated with program-specific 18 services or facilities, including but not limited to energy 19 storage, renewable hydrogen, transmission, electric generating 20 facilities, electric distribution facilities, renewable natural 21 gas generation facilities, renewable natural gas distribution 22 facilities, utility-assisted hourly prices, or liquefied 23 natural gas facilities, or administrative and other overhead 24 costs relating to the same. 25 (b) A negotiated rate of return, for new or existing 26 facilities or services provided by the electric utility that 27 are serving the program created under the tariff, applicable to 28 the program for its duration. The use of existing facilities 29 would require reconciliation of impact to existing customers 30 and would no longer be subject to previously approved advance 31 ratemaking principles. In the event that the tariff or its 32 eligible customer class cease to exist, no charges shall be 33 imposed on or costs recovered from existing customers unless 34 approved in a general rate case. A utility may seek to 35 -8- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 8/ 53 H.F. 834 demonstrate the prudence, necessity, and use and usefulness 1 of program-specific facilities or services as defined in 2 subparagraph division (a) and recovery of costs for the same in 3 a general rate proceeding, without any presumption regarding 4 approval of such request. 5 (c) Application of the program to readily identifiable 6 customer usage patterns, customer characteristics, or output 7 of specified facilities. 8 (d) Assignment of program benefits, including nonmonetary 9 benefits that may derive from dynamically balancing supply and 10 demand, providing ancillary services, or the production of 11 renewable energy attributes. 12 (e) Refund, credit, or waive the base rate or charge for 13 the replaced service when the program created under the tariff 14 replaces a service for which the public utility collects an 15 existing base rate or charge. A participating customer shall 16 pay the costs of remaining services received from the public 17 utility unless those costs are refunded, credited, or waived 18 under the program created by the tariff. 19 (3) If a utility can demonstrate to the commission that 20 a proposed tariff generates excess revenue for the utility 21 as compared to total revenue without the tariff, such excess 22 revenue may be retained by the utility. 23 c. (1) A public utilityâs participation under this 24 subsection is not mandatory. A public utility that elects to 25 propose a tariff or tariff amendment under this subsection 26 shall file an application for approval with the commission. 27 The application shall include an identification of costs and 28 benefits related to the program for the commissionâs review of 29 the conditions specified in paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (1). 30 (2) Within thirty days, the commission shall approve, deny, 31 or docket for further review an application for a tariff or 32 amended tariff submitted pursuant to this subsection. If the 33 application is docketed for further review, the commission 34 shall render a decision within ninety days from the date of 35 -9- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 9/ 53 H.F. 834 application filing unless an objection has been filed with the 1 commission. If the application proposes to amend a tariff 2 previously approved under this subsection, the commission shall 3 not reconsider existing programs previously approved under the 4 tariff unless proposed as part of the amendment. All further 5 review shall be conducted as a contested case pursuant to 6 chapter 17A. 7 (3) If the application proposes to amend a tariff previously 8 approved under this subsection as described in paragraph âbâ , 9 subparagraph (2), the commission shall act on the application 10 as described in subparagraph (2) of this paragraph, but shall 11 not reconsider existing programs previously approved under the 12 tariff unless proposed as part of the amendment. 13 (4) In the exercise of its authority under this subsection, 14 the commission shall not: 15 (a) Limit the number of applications a public utility may 16 file pursuant to this subsection. 17 (b) Deny a tariff because a public utility is subject to an 18 alternative regulatory mechanism, nor require a public utility 19 subject to an alternative regulatory mechanism to record the 20 revenues and costs associated with the program inconsistent 21 with the federal energy regulatory commissionâs uniform system 22 of accounts; provided, however, that this provision shall not 23 prohibit the utilities commission from denying a tariff if the 24 proposed tariff would result in detrimental treatment of other 25 customers, or require adjustment to the calculation of the 26 alternative regulatory mechanism to reflect the impact of an 27 approved tariff. 28 (c) Condition its approval on the public utility changing 29 its proposal if the public utility has not agreed to such 30 changes. This subparagraph division shall not be interpreted 31 to prevent the commission from identifying changes to the 32 proposal that might result in approval. 33 (5) Tariffs and programs approved pursuant to this 34 subsection shall be rebuttably presumed just and reasonable in 35 -10- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 10/ 53 H.F. 834 any subsequent general rate case proceeding. 1 d. The commission shall not condition approval or denial of 2 a tariff on final adoption of rules by the commission. 3 e. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 4 to implement this subsection. 5 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 6 to a public utility filing an application with the utilities 7 commission for review of a tariff on or after the effective 8 date of this division of this Act. 9 DIVISION III 10 LAND RESTORATION ââ ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION LINES APPROVED BY 11 FEDERALLY REGISTERED PLANNING AUTHORITY TRANSMISSION PLANS 12 Sec. 8. Section 478.16, Code 2025, is amended to read as 13 follows: 14 478.16 Electric transmission lines ââ federally registered 15 planning authority transmission plans. 16 1. Development and investment in high-voltage transmission 17 is urgently needed to ensure the reliable, adequate, secure, 18 and stable delivery of electricity to consumers. To ensure 19 reliable electric service to the people of Iowa as a matter 20 of public policy, it is the intent of the general assembly 21 to express a preference for further investment in Iowa 22 transmission infrastructure by electric transmission owners who 23 have already dedicated significant resources to develop the 24 infrastructure on which Iowans rely and who are better able to 25 provide reliable electric service to local electric utilities 26 and retail customers in Iowa. 27 1. 2. As used in this section , unless the context otherwise 28 requires: 29 a. âElectric transmission lineâ means a high-voltage 30 electric transmission line located in this state with a 31 capacity voltage of one hundred kilovolts or more and any 32 associated electric transmission facility, including any 33 substation or other equipment located in this state . 34 b. âElectric transmission ownerâ means an individual 35 -11- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 11/ 53 H.F. 834 or entity who, as of July 1, 2020, formed, located, or 1 headquartered in any state who owns and maintains an 2 electric transmission line in this state that is required 3 for rate-regulated electric utilities, municipal electric 4 utilities, and rural electric cooperatives in this state to 5 provide electric service to the public for compensation. 6 c. âIncumbent electric transmission ownerâ means any an 7 individual or entity meeting the definition of the following: 8 (1) A public utility or a municipally owned utility that 9 owns, operates, and maintains an electric transmission line in 10 this state. 11 (2) An electric cooperative corporation or association or 12 municipally owned utility that owns an electric transmission 13 facility in this state and has turned over the functional 14 control of such facility to a federally approved authority. 15 (3) An an âelectric transmission ownerâ as defined in 16 paragraph âbâ on or before July 1, 2024 . 17 d. âLandownerâ means the same as defined in section 478.2 18 âInitial constructionâ means the construction necessary to 19 establish and place an electric transmission line into initial 20 operation . 21 e. âLoad ratio shareâ means the amount, expressed as a 22 percentage, of a public power utilityâs electric load divided 23 by the total electric load in the applicable incumbent electric 24 transmission ownerâs pricing zone. 25 e. f. âMunicipally owned utilityâ means a âcity utilityâ 26 as defined in section 362.2 , or an âelectric power agencyâ as 27 defined in section 390.9 which that is comprised solely of 28 cities or solely of cities and other political subdivisions. 29 g. âPublic power utilityâ means a municipally owned utility 30 or an electric cooperative corporation or association that 31 receives transmission service from an incumbent electric 32 transmission owner, or that is subject to regional cost 33 allocation for the electric transmission line, or both. 34 h. âQualified individualâ means someone who is capable and 35 -12- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 12/ 53 H.F. 834 knowledgable enough to determine compliance with the standards 1 set forth in this section. 2 2. 3. a. An incumbent electric transmission owner has the 3 right to construct, own, and maintain an electric transmission 4 line that has been approved for construction in a federally 5 registered planning authority transmission plan and which that 6 directly connects to an electric transmission facility owned by 7 the incumbent electric transmission owner. Where a proposed 8 electric transmission line would directly connect to electric 9 transmission facilities owned by two or more incumbent electric 10 transmission owners, each incumbent electric transmission owner 11 whose facility connects to the electric transmission line 12 has the right to construct, own, and maintain the electric 13 transmission line individually and equally. If an incumbent 14 electric transmission owner declines to construct, own, and 15 maintain its portion of an electric transmission line that 16 would connect to electric transmission facilities owned by 17 two or more incumbent electric transmission owners, then the 18 other incumbent electric transmission owner or owners that 19 own an electric transmission facility to which the electric 20 transmission line connects has the right to construct, own, and 21 maintain the electric transmission line individually. 22 b. An eligible incumbent electric transmission owner 23 exercising the right to construct, own, and maintain an 24 electric transmission line pursuant to paragraph âaâ shall 25 offer public power utilities an opportunity to jointly own a 26 portion of the electric transmission line and such offer shall 27 be in an amount not less than a public power utilityâs load 28 ratio share, pursuant to a written agreement. Nothing in this 29 section shall be construed to prohibit an incumbent electric 30 transmission owner and a public power utility from agreeing to 31 joint ownership of an electric transmission line in an amount 32 different than the public power utilityâs load ratio share. A 33 public power utility may transfer or assign joint ownership 34 rights acquired under this section to another public power 35 -13- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 13/ 53 H.F. 834 utility or group of public power utilities by mutual consent of 1 the eligible contracting parties. 2 c. An eligible incumbent electric transmission owner 3 exercising the right to construct, own, and maintain an 4 electric transmission line pursuant to paragraph âaâ may 5 contract with another electric transmission owner or electric 6 public utility as defined in section 476.1 to jointly own a 7 portion of the electric transmission line pursuant to a written 8 agreement. 9 d. For purposes of this section, a municipally owned utility 10 or an electric cooperative corporation or association may elect 11 to be an incumbent electric transmission owner or a public 12 power utility but cannot act as both with respect to a single 13 transmission line. 14 3. 4. If an electric transmission line has been approved 15 for construction in a federally registered planning authority 16 transmission plan, and the electric transmission line is 17 not subject to a right of first refusal in accordance with 18 the tariff of a federally registered planning authority 19 and would otherwise be subject to a competitive developer 20 process , then within the later of ninety days of approval for 21 construction or ninety days after enactment of this division 22 of this Act , an incumbent electric transmission owner, or 23 owners if there is more than one owner, that owns a connecting 24 electric transmission facility shall give written notice 25 to the commission regarding whether the incumbent electric 26 transmission owner or owners intend to construct, own, and 27 maintain the electric transmission line. If the incumbent 28 electric transmission owner or owners give notice of intent 29 to construct the electric transmission line, the incumbent 30 electric transmission owner or owners shall follow the 31 applicable franchise requirements pursuant to this chapter . 32 The incumbent electric transmission owner shall update the 33 notice to construct an electric transmission line to include 34 information concerning the implementation of joint ownership 35 -14- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 14/ 53 H.F. 834 as described in subsection 3, paragraphs âbâ and âcâ , within 1 thirty days after a written agreement has been reached between 2 the parties. If the incumbent electric transmission owner 3 or owners give notice declining to construct the electric 4 transmission line, the commission may determine whether another 5 person may construct the electric transmission line. 6 4. 5. For projects where for which an election to construct 7 an electric transmission line has been made under this section , 8 all of the following cost accountability measures shall apply: 9 a. Within thirty days after the issuance of a franchise 10 pursuant to this chapter for the electric transmission line, 11 the incumbent electric transmission owner or owners shall 12 provide to the commission an estimate of the cost to construct 13 complete the initial construction of the electric transmission 14 line. 15 b. Until the initial construction of the electric 16 transmission line is complete, the incumbent electric 17 transmission owner or owners shall provide a quarterly report 18 to the commission, which shall include an updated estimate of 19 the cost to construct the electric transmission line , and an 20 explanation of changes in the cost estimate from the prior 21 cost estimate , and documentation that the incumbent electric 22 transmission owner or owners have used competitively bid 23 construction contracts that meet all the technical, commercial, 24 and other specifications, such as safety performance, that 25 are required by the incumbent electric transmission owner or 26 owners with respect to the initial construction of the electric 27 transmission line . 28 c. The consumer advocate appointed under section 475A.1 29 shall have free access to documents, reports, and information 30 submitted to the commission pursuant to this subsection, 31 consistent with section 475A.4. To the extent relevant, the 32 commission and the consumer advocate may use the information 33 for any purpose properly within the scope of their respective 34 duties including but not limited to use in proceedings before 35 -15- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 15/ 53 H.F. 834 the federal energy regulatory commission to challenge the 1 costs incurred by the incumbent electric transmission owner. 2 However, this subsection does not create a private cause of 3 action or complaint. 4 5. 6. This section shall not modify the authority of the 5 commission under this chapter , the rights of landowners under 6 this chapter , or the requirements, rights, and obligations 7 relating to the construction, maintenance, and operation of 8 electric transmission lines pursuant to this chapter . 9 6. 7. This section shall not apply to an electric 10 transmission line to be placed underground that has not been 11 approved for construction in a federally registered planning 12 authority transmission plan. 13 7. 8. The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 14 17A to administer this section , which shall include rules 15 regarding the restoration of agricultural lands following the 16 initial construction of an electric transmission line, as 17 specified in subsection 9 . 18 9. The commission shall adopt rules to implement the 19 following requirements, which shall not apply within the 20 corporate limits of a city or to any construction, activity, or 21 electric transmission lines other than the initial construction 22 of an electric transmission line with a voltage of two hundred 23 or more kilovolts and for which an election to construct has 24 been made under this section: 25 a. An incumbent electric transmission owner shall repair a 26 damaged underground drain tile as soon as practicable during 27 construction of the electric transmission line. Permanent 28 repairs to the damaged underground drain tile shall be 29 completed as soon as practicable after the initial construction 30 of the electric transmission line is complete. The repairs 31 made to the damaged drain tile shall be of at least equal 32 quality, size, and flow capacity of the original drain tile. 33 b. Following the initial construction of an electric 34 transmission line, the incumbent electric transmission owner 35 -16- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 16/ 53 H.F. 834 shall remove from the easement area all rock larger than 1 three inches in average diameter not native to the soil of 2 the excavated land. The rock removed from the excavated land 3 that cannot be used to backfill shall be disposed of at a 4 location and in a manner agreed upon by the incumbent electric 5 transmission owner and the landowner. 6 c. Upon completion of construction activities on a property, 7 the incumbent electric transmission owner shall deep till 8 agricultural land, including right-of-way access points or 9 roads traversed by heavy construction equipment, to alleviate 10 soil compaction. The land shall be tilled at least eighteen 11 inches deep in land used for crop production and twelve 12 inches deep in other lands unless otherwise agreed to by the 13 landowner. 14 d. Upon completion of the electric transmission line, 15 the incumbent electric transmission owner shall restore the 16 soil conservation practices and structures damaged during 17 construction of the electric transmission line to the elevation 18 and grade existing on the land prior to the construction. 19 The soil used to repair embankments intended to retain water 20 shall be well compacted. Any vegetation disturbed during 21 construction shall be reestablished, including cover crops when 22 appropriate. 23 e. Following compaction of the land, agricultural land that 24 is not in row crop or small grain production at the time of 25 construction, including hay ground and land in conservation or 26 set-aside programs, shall be reseeded and a cover crop shall 27 be utilized when appropriate. Seeding for cover crops may be 28 delayed if the construction of the electric transmission line 29 is completed too late in the year for a cover crop to become 30 established and is not required if the land will be tilled in 31 the following year. The landowner may request ground cover 32 to prevent soil erosion in areas where construction on the 33 electric transmission line is completed if the season is not 34 suitable for seeding a cover crop. 35 -17- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 17/ 53 H.F. 834 f. Unless agreed upon by the incumbent electric transmission 1 owner and the landowner, the incumbent electric transmission 2 owner shall remove field entrances or temporary roads built for 3 the purpose of constructing the electric transmission line upon 4 the completion of the initial construction and restore the area 5 to its previous use. 6 g. An incumbent electric transmission owner shall use good 7 utility practices for constructing the electric transmission 8 line in wet conditions, such as electing to use matting or 9 padding when utilizing heavy equipment. An incumbent electric 10 transmission owner shall grade and till any rutted land to 11 restore, to the extent practicable, the original condition of 12 the land prior to the construction of the electric transmission 13 line. If agreed upon by the incumbent electric transmission 14 owner and the landowner, the landowner may repair any damage 15 caused by construction activities in wet conditions and the 16 incumbent electric transmission owner shall reimburse the 17 landowner for the reasonable cost incurred to repair the 18 damage. If an incumbent electric transmission owner utilizes 19 heavy equipment in wetlands or mudflats, mats or other measures 20 shall be utilized to minimize soil disturbance. 21 h. For each electric transmission line, the incumbent 22 electric transmission owner shall designate a point of 23 contact for inquiries or claims from an affected person. The 24 designation shall include a name, a telephone number, an email 25 address, and an address. 26 10. a. If an incumbent electric transmission owner and 27 a landowner dispute a potential violation of the restoration 28 standards provided in subsection 9, the commission may 29 appoint a qualified individual to inspect the property for 30 compliance. If the qualified individual determines that 31 there has been a violation of the applicable restoration 32 standards, the commission shall provide oral notice, followed 33 by written notice, to the incumbent electric transmission 34 owner and the contractor operating for the incumbent electric 35 -18- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 18/ 53 H.F. 834 transmission owner and order corrective action to comply with 1 the restoration standards. The incumbent electric transmission 2 owner shall be responsible for the costs of the corrective 3 action. 4 b. If the incumbent electric transmission owner or the 5 contractor for the incumbent electric transmission owner does 6 not comply with a valid order for corrective action issued by 7 the commission, the commission may issue an order requiring 8 corrective action to be taken and may impose civil penalties 9 under section 478.29. 10 c. The commission shall instruct the inspector appointed by 11 the commission regarding the content of the statutes and rules 12 and the responsibility of the inspector to require restoration 13 conforming with the standards established in subsection 9. 14 11. a. A petitioner for a franchise for an electric 15 transmission line shall file with the petition a written land 16 restoration plan that documents how the requirements and rules 17 of subsection 9 will be met. The petitioner shall provide a 18 copy of the plan to all landowners of property that will be 19 disturbed by the initial construction. 20 b. Nothing in this section shall preclude the application 21 of provisions for protecting or restoring property that are 22 different than those prescribed in subsection 9, in rules 23 adopted under subsection 9, or in the land restoration plan, 24 if the alternative provisions are contained in agreements 25 independently executed by the incumbent electric transmission 26 owner and the landowner. Independent agreements for land 27 restoration between the incumbent electric transmission owner 28 and the landowner shall be in writing and provided to the 29 commission. 30 c. The commission may by waiver allow variations from 31 the requirements of subsection 9 if the incumbent electric 32 transmission owner requesting a waiver satisfies the standards 33 set forth in section 17A.9A and if the alternative methods 34 proposed by the incumbent electric transmission owner would 35 -19- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 19/ 53 H.F. 834 restore the land to a condition as good as or better than as 1 provided for in subsection 9. 2 d. The commission may waive preparation of a separate 3 land restoration plan if the incumbent electric transmission 4 owner enters into an agricultural impact mitigation plan 5 or similar agreement with the appropriate agencies of this 6 state that satisfies the requirements of subsection 9. If a 7 mitigation plan or agreement is used to fully or partially meet 8 the requirements of a land restoration plan, the statement 9 or agreement shall be filed with the commission and shall be 10 considered to be, or to be part of, the land restoration plan 11 for purposes of subsection 9. 12 12. Nothing in this section shall limit, expand, or 13 otherwise modify the rights of access and obligations for 14 damages set forth in section 478.17. 15 Sec. 9. Section 478.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 478.18 Supervision of construction ââ location. 18 1. The utilities commission shall have power of supervision 19 over the construction of a transmission line and over its 20 future operation and maintenance , including inspections for 21 compliance with the standards adopted under section 478.16 22 after restoration of the land is complete . 23 2. A transmission line shall be constructed near and 24 parallel to roads, to the right-of-way of the railways of the 25 state, or along the division lines of the lands, according 26 to the government survey, wherever the same is practicable 27 and reasonable, and so as not to interfere with the use 28 by the public of the highways or streams of the state, nor 29 unnecessarily interfere with the use of any lands by the 30 occupant. 31 3. The utilities commission may contract a qualified 32 individual for the purpose of inspections authorized under 33 section 478.16. The reasonable cost of the inspection shall 34 be paid by the incumbent electric transmission owner. The 35 -20- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 20/ 53 H.F. 834 utilities commission shall instruct the inspector appointed by 1 the commission regarding the content of the statutes and rules 2 and the responsibility of the inspector to require restoration 3 conforming with the applicable standards established in section 4 478.16. For purposes of this section, âqualified individualâ 5 means the same as defined in section 478.16. 6 Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 7 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 8 Sec. 11. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. With the exception 9 of the portion of the section of this division of this Act 10 amending section 478.16, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ, this 11 division of this Act applies retroactively to transmission 12 lines included in a federally registered planning authority 13 long-term transmission plan approved on or after July 1, 14 2020. The portion of the section of this division of this 15 Act amending section 478.16, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ, 16 shall apply retroactively to transmission lines included in a 17 federally registered planning authority long-term transmission 18 plan approved on or after July 1, 2024. 19 DIVISION IV 20 ENERGY AND WATER INFRASTRUCTURE REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM 21 Sec. 12. Section 476.46A, Code 2025, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 476.46A Energy and water infrastructure revolving loan 24 program. 25 1. a. An energy and water infrastructure revolving loan 26 fund is created in the office of the treasurer of state and 27 shall be administered by the Iowa energy center economic 28 development authority established in section 15.120 15.105 . 29 b. The fund may be administered as a revolving fund and may 30 consist of any moneys appropriated by the general assembly for 31 purposes of this section and any other moneys that are lawfully 32 directed to the fund. 33 c. Moneys in the fund shall be used to provide financial 34 assistance for the development and construction of energy or 35 -21- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 21/ 53 H.F. 834 water infrastructure , including projects that support electric 1 or gas generation transmission, storage, or distribution; 2 electric grid modernization; energy-sector workforce 3 development; emergency preparedness for rural and underserved 4 areas; the expansion of biomass, biogas, and renewable 5 natural gas; innovative technologies; and the development of 6 infrastructure for alternative fuel vehicles that support 7 economic development . 8 d. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this 9 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 10 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 11 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 12 succeeding fiscal year. 13 e. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or 14 earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. 15 2. a. The Iowa energy center economic development 16 authority shall establish and administer an energy and 17 water infrastructure revolving loan program to encourage the 18 development of energy and water infrastructure within the 19 state. 20 b. An individual, business, rural electric cooperative, 21 or municipal utility located and operating in this state 22 shall be eligible for financial assistance under the program. 23 With the approval of the Iowa energy center governing board 24 established under section 15.120, subsection 2 , the economic 25 development authority shall determine the amount and the 26 terms of all financial assistance awarded to an individual, 27 business, rural electric cooperative, or municipal utility 28 under the program. All agreements and administrative authority 29 shall be vested in the Iowa energy center governing board. 30 To be eligible for a financial assistance award under the 31 energy and water infrastructure revolving loan program, an 32 eligible borrower must demonstrate that the proposed project 33 will attract and encourage the location of new industrial 34 enterprise or the expansion of existing industrial enterprise. 35 -22- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 22/ 53 H.F. 834 Eligible borrowers may be awarded financial assistance 1 under the program for projects that support electric or gas 2 generation transmission, storage, or distribution; electric 3 grid modernization; energy sector workforce development; 4 emergency preparedness for rural and underserved areas; the 5 expansion of biomass, biogas, and renewable natural gas; or 6 innovative technologies and drinking water treatment systems 7 and wastewater treatment systems. The economic development 8 authority shall determine the amount and the terms of all 9 financial assistance awarded to an eligible borrower under the 10 program. All agreements and administrative authority shall be 11 vested in the economic development authority. The economic 12 development authority may adopt rules for the implementation of 13 this program. 14 c. The economic development authority may use not more than 15 five percent of the moneys in the fund at the beginning of each 16 fiscal year for purposes of administrative costs, marketing, 17 technical assistance, and other program support. 18 d. Each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the economic 19 development authority shall be authorized to transfer an amount 20 not to exceed six hundred thirty-three thousand dollars from 21 the energy and water infrastructure revolving loan fund to Iowa 22 state university of science and technology to be used for the 23 purposes of providing financial assistance to the state load 24 forecasting center. 25 3. For the purposes of this section : 26 a. âEligible borrowerâ means an individual, business, 27 county, city, rural electric cooperative, or municipal utility 28 located and operating in this state. 29 a. b. âEnergy infrastructureâ means land, buildings, 30 physical plant and equipment, and services directly related 31 to the development of projects used for, or useful for, 32 electricity or gas generation, transmission, storage, or 33 distribution. 34 b. c. âFinancial assistanceâ means the same as defined in 35 -23- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 23/ 53 H.F. 834 section 15.102 . 1 d. âWater infrastructureâ means water pollution control 2 facilities useful for the collection, treatment, and disposal 3 of sewage and industrial waste in a sanitary manner and 4 drinking water facilities useful for providing potable water to 5 residents served by a water system. 6 DIVISION V 7 ANAEROBIC DIGESTER SYSTEMS 8 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 459C.101 Title. 9 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âAnimal 10 Agriculture Compliance Act for Anaerobic Digester Systemsâ . 11 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 459C.102 Definitions. 12 1. For purposes of this chapter, unless the context 13 otherwise requires: 14 a. âAnaerobic digester systemâ or âdigesterâ means a covered 15 manure storage structure, if the function of the manure storage 16 structure is to process manure, by employing environmental 17 conditions including bacteria to break down organic matter in 18 the absence of oxygen, and is used for producing, collecting, 19 and utilizing a biogas, and may also process on-farm and 20 off-farm organic feedstocks, and food products or food for 21 human consumption if approved by the department pursuant to 22 section 459C.201, subsection 4. âAnaerobic digester systemâ 23 also includes related buildings, storage structures, transfer 24 pipes, and stockpiles associated with the digester process. 25 b. âDigestateâ means the dry or liquid nutrient-rich 26 material that remains after the anaerobic digestion of organic 27 matter, such as agricultural residues, food waste, or manure. 28 c. âOff-farm organic feedstocksâ means organic materials 29 that originate from outside the farm but can be used within 30 farming systems, particularly for soil enrichment, composting, 31 or other agricultural purposes. 32 d. âOn-farm organic feedstocksâ means organic materials 33 that are produced as by-products of farming activities that 34 typically come from plant or animal sources and may include 35 -24- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 24/ 53 H.F. 834 crop residues and other organic waste generated during farm 1 operations. 2 e. âOwnerâ means the person who owns an anaerobic digester 3 system. 4 2. Where not in conflict with the definitions set out in 5 subsection 1, the definitions provided in sections 459.102, 6 459A.102, and 459B.102 shall control. 7 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 459C.103 General authority ââ 8 commission and department ââ purpose ââ compliance. 9 1. The commission shall establish, by rule adopted pursuant 10 to chapter 17A, requirements relating to the construction, 11 including expansion, or operation of anaerobic digester 12 systems, including related buildings, storage structures, 13 transfer pipes, and stockpiles. 14 2. The purpose of this chapter is to provide requirements 15 relating to the construction, including the expansion, and 16 operation of anaerobic digester systems and the control of 17 digestate, which purpose shall be construed to supplement 18 applicable provisions of chapters 459, 459A, and 459B. If 19 there is a conflict between the provisions of this chapter and 20 chapters 459, 459A, and 459B, the provisions of this chapter 21 shall prevail. 22 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 459C.201 Anaerobic digester systems 23 ââ permit requirements. 24 1. The department shall approve applications for permits 25 for the construction, including the expansion, of anaerobic 26 digester systems, as provided by rules adopted pursuant to this 27 chapter. The departmentâs decision to approve a permit for the 28 construction of an anaerobic digester system shall be based on 29 whether the application is submitted according to procedures 30 required by the department and the application meets standards 31 established by the department. Construction of an anaerobic 32 digester system requiring a permit under this section shall not 33 begin until the department first approves the application and 34 issues a construction permit. 35 -25- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 25/ 53 H.F. 834 2. In addition to the construction permit application under 1 subsection 1, the following must be submitted in order for the 2 department to approve the application: 3 a. A two hundred fifty dollar construction permit 4 application fee. 5 b. A written plan for the disposal of the digestate. 6 c. A written operation plan for the anaerobic digester 7 system detailing the responsibilities of all owners, animal 8 feeding operations, or other entities involved in the anaerobic 9 digester system processes. 10 3. Every anaerobic digester system shall obtain a 11 construction permit, regardless of size of the anaerobic 12 digester system or facility. The owner of the anaerobic 13 digester system is considered the applicant and shall be 14 responsible for the construction and operation of the anaerobic 15 digester system. 16 4. a. Every anaerobic digester system is intended to accept 17 only manure unless department approval is obtained for the 18 inclusion of on-farm and off-farm organic by-products, food 19 products, or food for human consumption. Nonmanure material 20 shall not exceed ten percent of the total material added to the 21 anaerobic digester system. 22 b. Daily records of the volumes of all materials added 23 to the anaerobic digester system shall be required to be 24 maintained at the facility. 25 c. The department may require additional testing or 26 monitoring of any manure or nonmanure component being added 27 to the anaerobic digester system. The department may require 28 additional testing of the digestate. 29 d. Medical wastes, including expired or unused antibiotics, 30 petroleum products not designed for use in manure storage 31 facilities, pesticides, paints, solvents, hazardous materials, 32 municipal or sanitary waste or sludge, industrial wastewater, 33 contaminated feedstock, slaughterhouse wastes, and residues 34 from processing of food materials that have not been deemed 35 -26- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 26/ 53 H.F. 834 acceptable for human consumption shall not be processed in the 1 anaerobic digester system. 2 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 459C.202 Construction design standard 3 ââ anaerobic digester systems. 4 1. The department shall adopt rules establishing 5 construction design standards for formed manure storage 6 structures that are part of an anaerobic digester system. 7 2. The construction design standards shall be based, to 8 every extent possible, upon uniform standards such as available 9 standards promulgated by the American society for testing and 10 materials international. The department may require that all 11 or part of a formed manure storage structure be constructed of 12 concrete. 13 3. The construction design standards for concrete shall 14 provide for all of the following: 15 a. The concreteâs minimum compressive strength calculated on 16 a pounds-per-square-inch basis. 17 b. The use of reinforcement, including but not limited to 18 the grade, amount, and location of steel rebar, fiberglass, or 19 similar materials set in the concrete, or the use of exterior 20 braces to support joints. 21 c. The depth of footings. 22 d. The thickness of the footings, the floor, and walls. 23 4. A person shall only construct a formed manure storage 24 structure on karst terrain or an area that drains into a known 25 sinkhole pursuant to upgraded construction design standards 26 necessary to ensure that the structure does not pollute 27 groundwater sources. The construction of unformed manure 28 storage structures is prohibited on karst terrain. 29 Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 459C.203 Distance requirements. 30 1. Water quality related requirements. 31 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the following 32 requirements shall apply to the location of an anaerobic 33 digester system manure storage structure: 34 (1) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 35 -27- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 27/ 53 H.F. 834 shall not be constructed closer than five hundred feet away 1 from the surface intake of an agricultural drainage well. An 2 anaerobic digester system manure storage structure shall not 3 be constructed closer than two thousand feet from a wellhead, 4 cistern of an agricultural drainage well, or known sinkhole. 5 (2) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 6 shall not be constructed if the anaerobic digester system 7 manure storage structure as constructed is closer than any of 8 the following: 9 (a) Five hundred feet away from a water source other than a 10 major water source. 11 (b) One thousand feet away from a major water source. 12 (c) Two thousand five hundred feet away from a designated 13 wetland. 14 (3) (a) A water source, other than a major water source, 15 shall not be constructed, expanded, or diverted, if the water 16 source as constructed, expanded, or diverted is closer than 17 five hundred feet away from an anaerobic digester system manure 18 storage structure. 19 (b) A major water source shall not be constructed, expanded, 20 or diverted, if the major water source as constructed, 21 expanded, or diverted is closer than one thousand feet from an 22 anaerobic digester system manure storage structure. 23 (c) A designated wetland shall not be established, if the 24 designated wetland is closer than two thousand five hundred 25 feet away from an anaerobic digester system manure storage 26 structure. 27 (4) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 28 shall not be constructed on land that is part of a one 29 hundred year floodplain as designated by rules adopted by the 30 department pursuant to section 459.301. 31 b. A separation distance required in paragraph âaâ shall not 32 apply to any of the following: 33 (1) A location or object and a farm pond or privately owned 34 lake, as defined in section 462A.2. 35 -28- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 28/ 53 H.F. 834 (2) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 1 constructed with a secondary containment barrier. The 2 department shall adopt rules providing for the construction and 3 use of a secondary containment barrier, including construction 4 design standards. 5 2. Air quality related requirements. 6 a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the following 7 requirements shall apply to the location of an anaerobic 8 digester system manure storage structure: 9 (1) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 10 shall not be constructed closer than three thousand feet from 11 a residence not owned by the owner of the anaerobic digester 12 system or the owner of the animal feeding operation where the 13 anaerobic digester system is located; a bona fide religious 14 institution; a public use area; a commercial enterprise; or an 15 educational institution. 16 (2) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 17 shall not be constructed closer than one hundred feet from a 18 public thoroughfare. 19 b. A separation distance required in paragraph âaâ shall not 20 apply to any of the following: 21 (1) (a) An anaerobic digester system manure storage 22 structure that is constructed or expanded, if the titleholder 23 of the land benefiting from the distance separation requirement 24 executes a written waiver with the titleholder of the land 25 where the structure is located. If an anaerobic digester 26 system manure storage structure is constructed or expanded 27 within the separation distance required between an anaerobic 28 digester system manure storage structure and a public 29 thoroughfare, the state or a political subdivision constructing 30 or maintaining the public thoroughfare benefiting from the 31 distance separation requirement may execute a written waiver 32 with the titleholder of the land where the structure is 33 located. 34 (b) A written waiver under this subsection becomes 35 -29- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 29/ 53 H.F. 834 effective only upon the recording of the waiver in the office 1 of the recorder of the county in which the benefited land is 2 located. The filed waiver shall preclude enforcement by the 3 state as it relates to a distance requirement between the 4 anaerobic digester system manure storage structure and the 5 location or object benefiting from the separation distance 6 requirement. 7 (2) An anaerobic digester system manure storage structure 8 that is constructed or expanded within any distance from a 9 residence, educational institution, commercial enterprise, bona 10 fide religious institution, city, or public use area, if the 11 residence, educational institution, commercial enterprise, or 12 bona fide religious institution was constructed or expanded, or 13 the boundaries of the city or public use area were expanded, 14 after the date that the anaerobic digester system manure 15 storage structure was established. The date the anaerobic 16 digester system manure storage structure was established is 17 the date on which the anaerobic digester system commenced 18 operating. A change in ownership or expansion of the anaerobic 19 digester system shall not change the established date of 20 operation. 21 Sec. 19. NEW SECTION . 459C.301 Minimum requirements for 22 digestate control. 23 1. An anaerobic digester system shall retain all digestate 24 produced by the operation between periods of digestate disposal 25 or delivery to animal feeding operations. For purposes of 26 this section, dry digestate may be retained by stockpiling as 27 provided in this subchapter. An anaerobic digester system 28 shall not discharge digestate directly into water of the state 29 or into a tile line that discharges directly into water of the 30 state. 31 2. Digestate from an anaerobic digester system shall be 32 disposed of in a manner that will not cause surface water or 33 groundwater pollution. 34 3. The owner of the anaerobic digester system that 35 -30- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 30/ 53 H.F. 834 discontinues the use of the operation shall remove all 1 digestate from related anaerobic digester system structures 2 used to store digestate within six months following the date 3 that the anaerobic digester system is discontinued. 4 Sec. 20. NEW SECTION . 459C.302 Disposal of digestate 5 requirements. 6 1. If digestate is returned to an animal feeding operation 7 for land application, the material must be accounted for in the 8 animal feeding operationâs manure management plan or nutrient 9 management plan. 10 2. For any portion of the digestate not returned to an 11 animal feeding operation, the owner of the anaerobic digester 12 system shall satisfy all applicable law for proper application 13 of the digestate. 14 Sec. 21. NEW SECTION . 459C.401 Stockpiling requirements. 15 1. An anaerobic digester system may stockpile materials 16 prior to digestation or dry digestate so long as the facility 17 stockpiles the materials and dry digestate in compliance with 18 restrictions applicable to stockpiling as provided in this 19 subchapter. 20 2. Anaerobic digester system stockpiles shall not be 21 commingled with animal feeding operation stockpiles. 22 3. A person shall not stockpile the materials and dry 23 digestate within the following distances from any of the 24 following: 25 a. A terrace tile inlet or surface tile inlet, two hundred 26 feet. However, this paragraph does not apply to a person who 27 stockpiles the dry digestate in a manner that does not allow 28 precipitation-induced runoff to drain from the stockpile to the 29 terrace tile inlet or surface tile inlet. A terrace tile inlet 30 or surface tile inlet does not include a tile inlet that is not 31 directly connected to a tile line that discharges directly into 32 a water of the state. 33 b. (1) A designated area, four hundred feet. However, an 34 increased separation distance of eight hundred feet shall apply 35 -31- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 31/ 53 H.F. 834 to all of the following: 1 (a) A high-quality water resource. 2 (b) An agricultural drainage well. 3 (c) A known sinkhole. 4 (2) Subparagraph (1) does not apply to a person who 5 stockpiles materials or dry digestate in a manner that does not 6 allow precipitation-induced runoff to drain from the stockpile 7 to the designated area. 8 c. One thousand two hundred fifty feet from a residence 9 not owned by the owner of the anaerobic digester system or 10 the owner of the animal feeding operation where the anaerobic 11 digester system is located; a bona fide religious institution; 12 a public use area; a commercial enterprise; or an educational 13 institution. 14 4. A person shall not stockpile materials or dry digestate 15 in a grassed waterway. 16 5. A person shall not stockpile materials or dry digestate 17 on land having a slope of more than three percent. However, 18 this subsection shall not apply to a person who stockpiles 19 materials or dry digestate using methods, structures, or 20 practices that contain the stockpile, including but not limited 21 to silt fences, temporary earthen berms, or other effective 22 measures, and that prevent or diminish precipitation-induced 23 runoff from the stockpile. 24 6. A person stockpiling materials or dry digestate on 25 terrain, other than karst terrain, for more than fifteen 26 consecutive days shall comply with any of the following: 27 a. Stockpile materials or dry digestate using a qualified 28 stockpile structure or qualified stockpile cover. However, the 29 person shall not stockpile materials or dry digestate using a 30 qualified stockpile cover at a long-term stockpile location 31 unless the person stockpiles the materials or dry digestate 32 on compacted soil, compacted granular aggregates, asphalt, 33 concrete, or other similar materials. 34 b. Deliver a stockpile inspection statement to the 35 -32- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 32/ 53 H.F. 834 department by the fifteenth day of each month in writing, which 1 may be on a form prescribed by the department. The stockpile 2 inspection statement shall provide the location of the 3 stockpile and document the results of an inspection conducted 4 by the person during the previous month. The inspection must 5 evaluate whether precipitation-induced runoff is draining 6 away from the stockpile and, if so, describe actions taken 7 to prevent the runoff. If an inspection by the department 8 documents that precipitation-induced runoff is draining away 9 from a stockpile, the person shall immediately remove dry 10 digestate from the stockpile in compliance with this chapter 11 or comply with all directives of the department to prevent the 12 runoff. 13 7. A person stockpiling materials or dry digestate on karst 14 terrain shall comply with all of the following: 15 a. If the proposed stockpile is located in potential karst 16 terrain, a professional engineer licensed in Iowa or a staff 17 person or organization qualified through the Iowa natural 18 resource conservation service shall submit a soil report to 19 the department, based on the results from soil corings, test 20 pits, or acceptable well log data, describing the subsurface 21 materials and vertical separation distance from the proposed 22 bottom of the stockpile to the underlying limestone, dolomite, 23 or soluble rock. A minimum of two soil corings spaced equally 24 within the stockpile location or two test pits located within 25 five feet of the outside of the stockpile location are required 26 if acceptable well log data is not available. The soil 27 corings shall be taken to a minimum depth of twenty-five feet 28 below the bottom elevation of the proposed stockpile or into 29 bedrock, whichever is shallower. After the soil exploration 30 is complete, each coring or test pit shall be properly plugged 31 with concrete grout, bentonite, or similar materials and 32 completion of this activity shall be documented in the soil 33 report. If a twenty-five-foot vertical separation distance can 34 be maintained between the bottom of the proposed stockpile and 35 -33- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 33/ 53 H.F. 834 limestone, dolomite, or other soluble rock, then the structure 1 is not considered to be in karst terrain. 2 b. The person shall stockpile the dry digestate at a 3 location where there is a vertical separation distance of at 4 least five feet between the bottom of the stockpile and the 5 underlying limestone, dolomite, or other soluble rock. 6 c. A person who stockpiles materials or dry digestate 7 for more than fifteen consecutive days shall use any of the 8 following: 9 (1) A qualified stockpile structure. 10 (2) A qualified stockpile cover. However, the person shall 11 not stockpile materials or dry digestate using a qualified 12 stockpile cover at a long-term stockpile location unless the 13 stockpile is located on reinforced concrete at least five 14 inches thick. 15 8. A person stockpiling materials or dry digestate shall 16 comply with applicable national pollutant discharge elimination 17 system permit requirements pursuant to the federal Water 18 Pollution Control Act, 33 U.S.C. ch. 26, as amended, and 40 19 C.F.R. pts. 122 and 412. 20 9. A person stockpiling materials or dry digestate shall 21 remove the dry digestate and apply it in accordance with 22 the provisions of this chapter within six months after the 23 materials or dry digestate are first stockpiled. 24 Sec. 22. NEW SECTION . 459C.501 General enforcement. 25 The department and the attorney general shall enforce the 26 provisions of this chapter in the same manner as provided in 27 chapter 459, subchapter VI. 28 Sec. 23. NEW SECTION . 459C.502 Violations ââ civil penalty. 29 A person who violates a provision of this chapter for which 30 the alleged harm is related to air quality shall be subject 31 to the same penalty as provided in section 459.602. A person 32 who violates a provision of this chapter for which the alleged 33 harm is related to water quality shall be subject to the same 34 penalties and restrictions as provided in section 459.603. A 35 -34- LSB 1121HV (2) 91 sb/js 34/ 53 H.F. 834 habitual violator of the provisions of this chapter shall be 1 subject to the same penalties and restrictions as provided in 2 sections 459.604 and 459.605. Any collected civil penalty 3 and interest on a civil penalty shall be credited to the Iowa 4 nutrient research fund created in section 466B.46. 5 Sec. 24. CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE. 6 1. The Code editor shall designate sections 459C.101 7 through 459C.502, as enacted by this division of this Act, as 8 new chapter 459C, entitled âAnaerobic Digester Systemsâ. 9 2. The Code editor shall designate sections 459C.101 10 through 459C.103, as enacted by this division of this Act, 11 as a new subchapter within chapter 459C, entitled âGeneral 12 Provisionsâ. 13 3. The Code editor shall designate sections 459C.201 14 through 459C.203, as enacted by this division of this Act, as 15 a new subchapter within chapter 459C, entitled âConstruction 16 Provisionsâ. 17 4. The Code editor shall designate sections 459C.301 18 through 459C.302, as enacted by this division of this Act, 19 as a new subchapter within chapter 459C, entitled âDigestate 20 Disposalâ. 21 5. The Code editor shall designate section 459C.401, as 22 enacted by this division of this Act, as a new subchapter 23 within chapter 459C, entitled âStockpiling Provisionsâ. 24 6. The Code editor shall designate sections 459C.501 25 through 459C.502, as enacted by this division of this Act, as 26 a new subchapter within chapter 459C, entitled âEnforcement 27 Provisionsâ. 28